Illinois, session 104th, SB1911.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-178 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-178)7    Sec. 15-178. Affordable housing special assessment 8programs; reduction Reduction in assessed value for affordable 9rental housing construction or rehabilitation.10    (a) The General Assembly finds that there is a shortage of 11high quality affordable rental homes for low-income and 12very-low-income households throughout Illinois; that owners 13and developers of rental housing face significant challenges 14building newly constructed apartments or undertaking 15rehabilitation of existing properties that results in rents 16that are affordable for low-income and very-low-income 17households; and that it will help Cook County and other parts 18of Illinois address the extreme shortage of affordable rental 19housing by developing a statewide policy to determine the 20assessed value for newly constructed and rehabilitated 21affordable rental housing that both encourages investment and 22incentivizes property owners to keep rents affordable. 23    (b) Each chief county assessment officer shall implement   SB1911 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1special assessment programs to reduce the assessed value of 2all eligible newly constructed residential real property or 3qualifying rehabilitation to all eligible existing residential 4real property in accordance with subsection (c) for 10 taxable 5years after the newly constructed residential real property or 6the qualifying rehabilitation of a improvements to existing 7residential real property is are put in service. Any county 8with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants may decide not to 9implement one or both of the special assessment programs 10defined in subparagraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Section 11and subparagraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section upon 12passage of an ordinance by a majority vote of the county board. 13Subsequent to a vote to opt out of this special assessment 14program, any county with less than 3,000,000 inhabitants may 15decide to implement one or both of the special assessment 16programs defined in subparagraph (1) of subsection (c) of this 17Section and subparagraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Section 18upon passage of an ordinance by a majority vote of the county 19board. A county opting out shall not disqualify or shorten the 20maximum eligibility periods for any property approved to 21receive a reduced valuation prior to the county opting out. 22The special assessment programs available under this Section 23shall be available to all qualifying developments regardless 24of whether or not the property has or is currently receiving 25any other public financing or subsidies or subject to any 26regulatory agreements with any public entity, or both. The   SB1911 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1changes made to this subsection by this amendatory Act of the 2104th General Assembly are declarative of existing law and 3shall not be construed as a new enactment. Property is 4eligible for the special assessment program if and only if all 5of the following factors have been met: 6        (1) at the conclusion of the new construction or 7    qualifying rehabilitation, the property is a qualifying 8    development consists of a newly constructed multifamily 9    building containing 7 or more rental dwelling units or an 10    existing multifamily building that has undergone 11    qualifying rehabilitation resulting in 7 or more rental 12    dwelling units; and 13        (2) the property meets the application requirements 14    defined in subsection (f). 15    (c) For those counties that are required to implement the 16special assessment program and do not opt out of such special 17assessment program, the chief county assessment officer for 18that county shall require that residential real property is 19eligible for the special assessment program if and only if one 20of the additional factors have been met: 21        (1) except as defined in subparagraphs (E), (F), and 22    (G) of paragraph (1) of subsection (f) of this Section, 23    prior to the newly constructed residential real property 24    or the qualifying rehabilitation of improvements to 25    existing residential real property being put in service, 26    the owner of the residential real property commits that,   SB1911 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1    for a period of 10 years, at least 15% of the multifamily 2    building's units will have rents as defined in this 3    Section that are at or below maximum rents and are 4    occupied by households with household incomes at or below 5    maximum income limits; or 6        (2) except as defined in subparagraphs (E), (F), and 7    (G) of paragraph (1) of subsection (f) of this Section, 8    prior to the newly constructed residential real property 9    or the qualifying rehabilitation of improvements to 10    existing residential real property located in a low 11    affordability community being put in service, the owner of 12    the residential real property commits that, for a period 13    of 30 years after the newly constructed residential real 14    property or the qualifying rehabilitation of improvements 15    to existing residential real property is are put in 16    service, at least 20% of the multifamily building's units 17    will have rents as defined in this Section that are at or 18    below maximum rents and are occupied by households with 19    household incomes at or below maximum income limits. 20    If a reduction in assessed value is granted under one 21special assessment program provided for in this Section, then 22that same residential real property is not eligible for an 23additional special assessment program under this Section at 24the same time. 25    (d) The amount of the reduction in assessed value for 26residential real property meeting the conditions set forth in   SB1911 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1subparagraph (1) of subsection (c) shall be calculated as 2follows: 3        (1) if the owner of the residential real property 4    commits for a period of at least 10 years that at least 15% 5    but fewer than 35% of the multifamily building's units 6    have rents at or below maximum rents and are occupied by 7    households with household incomes at or below maximum 8    income limits, the assessed value of the property used to 9    calculate the tax bill shall be reduced by an amount equal 10    to 25% of the assessed value of the property as determined 11    by the assessor for the property in the current taxable 12    year for either the newly constructed residential real 13    property or based on the qualifying rehabilitation of a 14    residential real property improvements to an existing 15    residential real property; and 16        (2) if the owner of the residential real property 17    commits for a period of at least 10 years that at least 35% 18    of the multifamily building's units have rents at or below 19    maximum rents and are occupied by households with 20    household incomes at or below maximum income limits, the 21    assessed value of the property used to calculate the tax 22    bill shall be reduced by an amount equal to 35% of the 23    assessed value of the property as determined by the 24    assessor for the property in the current assessment year 25    for either the newly constructed residential real property 26    or based on the qualifying rehabilitation of a residential   SB1911 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1    real property improvements to an existing residential real 2    property. 3    (e) The amount of the reduction for residential real 4property meeting the conditions set forth in subparagraph (2) 5of subsection (c) shall be calculated as follows: 6        (1) for the first, second, and third taxable year 7    after the residential real property is placed in service, 8    the residential real property is entitled to a reduction 9    in its assessed value in an amount equal to the difference 10    between the assessed value in the year for which the 11    incentive is sought and the assessed value for the 12    residential real property in the base year; 13        (2) for the fourth, fifth, and sixth taxable year 14    after the residential real property is placed in service, 15    the property is entitled to a reduction in its assessed 16    value in an amount equal to 80% of the difference between 17    the assessed value in the year for which the incentive is 18    sought and the assessed value for the residential real 19    property in the base year; 20        (3) for the seventh, eighth, and ninth taxable year 21    after the property is placed in service, the residential 22    real property is entitled to a reduction in its assessed 23    value in an amount equal to 60% of the difference between 24    the assessed value in the year for which the incentive is 25    sought and the assessed value for the residential real 26    property in the base year;   SB1911 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1        (4) for the tenth, eleventh, and twelfth taxable year 2    after the residential real property is placed in service, 3    the residential real property is entitled to a reduction 4    in its assessed value in an amount equal to 40% of the 5    difference between the assessed value in the year for 6    which the incentive is sought and the assessed value for 7    the residential real property in the base year; and 8        (5) for the thirteenth through the thirtieth taxable 9    year after the residential real property is placed in 10    service, the residential real property is entitled to a 11    reduction in its assessed value in an amount equal to 20% 12    of the difference between the assessed value in the year 13    for which the incentive is sought and the assessed value 14    for the residential real property in the base year. 15    (f) Application requirements. 16        (1) In order to receive the reduced valuation under 17    this Section, the owner must submit an application 18    containing the following information to the chief county 19    assessment officer for review in the form and by the date 20    required by the chief county assessment officer or, in the 21    absence of forms issued by the chief county assessment 22    officer, the Department: 23            (A) the owner's name; 24            (B) the postal address and permanent index number 25        or numbers of the parcel or parcels for which the owner 26        is applying to receive reduced valuation under this   SB1911 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1        Section; 2            (C) a deed or other instrument conveying the 3        parcel or parcels to the current owner; 4            (D) written evidence that the new construction or 5        qualifying rehabilitation has been completed with 6        respect to the residential real property, including, 7        but not limited to, copies of building permits, a 8        notarized contractor's affidavit, and photographs of 9        the interior and exterior of the building after new 10        construction or rehabilitation is completed; 11            (E) written evidence that the residential real 12        property meets local building codes, or if there are 13        no local building codes, Housing Quality Standards, as 14        determined by the United States Department of Housing 15        and Urban Development; 16            (F) a list identifying the affordable units in 17        residential real property and a written statement that 18        the affordable units are comparable to the market rate 19        units in terms of unit type, number of bedrooms per 20        unit, quality of exterior appearance, energy 21        efficiency, and overall quality of construction; 22            (G) a written schedule certifying the rents in 23        each affordable unit and a written statement that 24        these rents do not exceed the maximum rents allowable 25        for the area in which the residential real property is 26        located;   SB1911 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1            (H) documentation from the administering agency 2        verifying the owner's participation in a qualifying 3        income-based rental subsidy program as defined in 4        subsection (e) of this Section if units receiving 5        rental subsidies are to be counted among the 6        affordable units in order to meet the thresholds 7        defined in this Section; 8            (I) a written statement identifying the household 9        income for every household occupying an affordable 10        unit and certifying that the household income does not 11        exceed the maximum income limits allowable for the 12        area in which the residential real property is 13        located; 14            (J) a written statement that the owner has 15        verified and retained documentation of household 16        income for every household occupying an affordable 17        unit; and 18            (K) any additional information consistent with 19        this Section as reasonably required by the chief 20        county assessment officer, including, but not limited 21        to, any information necessary to ensure compliance 22        with applicable local ordinances and to ensure the 23        owner is complying with the provisions of this 24        Section. 25        (1.1) In order for a development to receive the 26    reduced valuation under subsection (e), the owner must   SB1911 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1    provide evidence to the county assessor's office of a 2    fully executed project labor agreement entered into with 3    the applicable local building trades council, prior to 4    commencement of any and all construction, building, 5    renovation, demolition, or any material change to the 6    structure or land. 7        (2) The application requirements contained in 8    paragraph (1) of subsection (f) are continuing 9    requirements for the duration of the reduction in assessed 10    value received and may be annually or periodically 11    verified by the chief county assessment officer for the 12    county whereby the benefit is being issued.13        (3) In lieu of submitting an application containing 14    the information prescribed in paragraph (1) of subsection 15    (f), the chief county assessment officer may allow for 16    submission of a substantially similar certification 17    granted by the Illinois Housing Development Authority or a 18    comparable local authority provided that the chief county 19    assessment officer independently verifies the veracity of 20    the certification with the Illinois Housing Development 21    Authority or comparable local authority. 22        (4) The chief county assessment officer shall notify 23    the owner as to whether or not the property meets the 24    requirements of this Section. If the property does not 25    meet the requirements of this Section, the chief county 26    assessment officer shall provide written notice of any   SB1911 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1    deficiencies to the owner, who shall then have 30 days 2    from the date of notification to provide supplemental 3    information showing compliance with this Section. The 4    chief county assessment officer shall, in its discretion, 5    grant additional time to cure any deficiency. If the owner 6    does not exercise this right to cure the deficiency, or if 7    the information submitted, in the sole judgment of the 8    chief county assessment officer, is insufficient to meet 9    the requirements of this Section, the chief county 10    assessment officer shall provide a written explanation of 11    the reasons for denial. 12        (5) The chief county assessment officer may charge a 13    reasonable application fee to offset the administrative 14    expenses associated with the program. 15        (6) The reduced valuation conferred by this Section is 16    limited as follows: 17            (A) The owner is eligible to apply for the reduced 18        valuation conferred by this Section beginning in the 19        first assessment year after the effective date of this 20        amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly through 21        December 31, 2034 2027. If approved, the reduction 22        will be effective for the current assessment year, 23        which will be reflected in the tax bill issued in the 24        following calendar year. Owners that are approved for 25        the reduced valuation under paragraph (1) of 26        subsection (c) of this Section before December 31,   SB1911 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1        2034 2027 shall, at minimum, be eligible for annual 2        renewal of the reduced valuation during an initial 3        10-year period if annual certification requirements 4        are met for each of the 10 years, as described in 5        subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of subsection (d) of 6        this Section. If an owner is approved for the reduced 7        valuation conferred by this Section prior to December 8        31, 2034 and this Section is not subsequently 9        extended, this shall not disqualify or shorten the 10        maximum eligibility periods for any property approved 11        to receive a reduced valuation. 12            (B) Property receiving a reduction outlined in 13        paragraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Section shall 14        continue to be eligible for an initial period of up to 15        10 years if annual certification requirements are met 16        for each of the 10 years, but shall be extended for up 17        to 2 additional 10-year periods with annual renewals 18        if the owner continues to meet the requirements of 19        this Section, including annual certifications, and 20        excluding the requirements regarding new construction 21        or qualifying rehabilitation defined in subparagraph 22        (D) of paragraph (1) of this subsection. 23            (C) The annual certification materials in the year 24        prior to final year of eligibility for the reduction 25        in assessed value must include a dated copy of the 26        written notice provided to tenants informing them of   SB1911 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1        the date of the termination if the owner is not seeking 2        a renewal. 3            (D) If the property is sold or transferred, the 4        purchaser or transferee must comply with all 5        requirements of this Section, excluding the 6        requirements regarding new construction or qualifying 7        rehabilitation defined in subparagraph (D) of 8        paragraph (1) of this subsection, in order to continue 9        receiving the reduction in assessed value. Purchasers 10        and transferees who comply with all requirements of 11        this Section excluding the requirements regarding new 12        construction or qualifying rehabilitation defined in 13        subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) of this subsection 14        are eligible to apply for renewal on the schedule set 15        by the initial application. 16            (E) (Blank). The owner may apply for the reduced 17        valuation if the residential real property meets all 18        requirements of this Section and the newly constructed 19        residential real property or improvements to existing 20        residential real property were put in service on or 21        after January 1, 2015. However, the initial 10-year 22        eligibility period or 30-year eligibility period, 23        depending on the applicable program, shall be reduced 24        by the number of years between the placed in service 25        date and the date the owner first receives this 26        reduced valuation.   SB1911 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1            (F) The owner may apply for the reduced valuation 2        within 2 years after the newly constructed residential 3        real property or the qualifying rehabilitation of 4        improvements to existing residential real property is 5        are put in service. However, the initial 10-year 6        eligibility period or 30-year eligibility period, 7        depending on the applicable program, shall be reduced 8        for the number of years between the placed in service 9        date and the date the owner first receives this 10        reduced valuation. 11            (G) Owners of a multifamily building receiving a 12        reduced valuation through the Cook County Class 9 13        program during the year in which this amendatory Act 14        of the 102nd General Assembly takes effect shall be 15        deemed automatically eligible for the reduced 16        valuation defined in paragraph (1) of subsection (c) 17        of this Section in terms of meeting the criteria for 18        new construction or substantial rehabilitation for a 19        specific multifamily building regardless of when the 20        newly constructed residential real property or 21        improvements to existing residential real property 22        were put in service. If a Cook County Class 9 owner had 23        Class 9 status revoked on or after January 1, 2017 but 24        can provide documents sufficient to prove that the 25        revocation was in error or any deficiencies leading to 26        the revocation have been cured, the chief county   SB1911 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1        assessment officer may deem the owner to be eligible. 2        However, owners may not receive both the reduced 3        valuation under this Section and the reduced valuation 4        under the Cook County Class 9 program in any single 5        assessment year. In addition, the number of years 6        during which an owner has participated in the Class 9 7        program shall count against the 3 10-year periods of 8        eligibility for the reduced valuation as defined in 9        subparagraph (1) of subsection (c) of this Section. 10            (H) When the property exits the special assessment 11        program, the entire parcel shall be assessed as 12        otherwise provided by law At the completion of the 13        assessment reduction period described in this Section: 14        the entire parcel will be assessed as otherwise 15        provided by law. At any time prior to exiting the 16        special assessment program, a property owner may apply 17        for a renewed 30-year eligibility period, to begin on 18        the first day of the year following approval. 19            (H-5) Any property that has reached or will reach 20        the end of its 30-year eligibility period before 21        December 31, 2025 may remain in the program pending a 22        reapplication filed by December 31, 2026. Those 23        applications shall cite qualifying expenditures made 24        in the 2 years before the application. This 25        subparagraph (H-5) is inoperative on and after January 26        31, 2027.   SB1911 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1        (7) If the chief county assessment officer has not 2    created application forms, the chief county assessment 3    officer shall make publicly available and accept 4    applications forms that shall be available to local 5    governments from the Illinois Department of Revenue. If a 6    county Internet website exists, the application materials, 7    as well as any other program requirements used by the 8    county (such as application deadlines, fees, and other 9    procedures required by the application) must be published 10    on that website, otherwise it must be available to the 11    public upon request at the office of the chief county 12    assessment officer. 13    (g) As used in this Section: 14    "Affordable units" means units that have rents that do not 15exceed the maximum rents as defined in this Section. 16    "Assessed value for the residential real property in the 17base year" means the assessed value used to calculate the tax 18bill, as certified by the board of review, for the tax year 19immediately prior to the tax year in which the building permit 20is issued. For property assessed as other than residential 21property, the "assessed value for the residential real 22property in the base year" means the assessed value that would 23have been obtained had the property been classified as 24residential as derived from the board of review's certified 25market value. 26    "Consumer Price Index-u" means the index published by the   SB1911 Engrossed- 17 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 2Labor that measures the average change in prices of goods and 3services purchased by all urban consumers, United States city 4average, not seasonally adjusted, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 5    "Household income" includes the annual income for all the 6people who occupy a housing unit that is anticipated to be 7received from a source outside of the family during the 812-month period following admission or the annual 9recertification, including related family members and all the 10unrelated people who share the housing unit. Household income 11includes the total of the following income sources: wages, 12salaries and tips before any payroll deductions; net business 13income; interest and dividends; payments in lieu of earnings, 14such as unemployment and disability compensation, worker's 15compensation and severance pay; Social Security income, 16including lump sum payments; payments from insurance policies, 17annuities, pensions, disability benefits and other types of 18periodic payments, alimony, child support, and other regular 19monetary contributions; and public assistance, except for 20assistance from the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program 21(SNAP). "Household income" does not include: earnings of 22children under age 18; temporary income such as cash gifts; 23reimbursement for medical expenses; lump sums from 24inheritance, insurance payments, settlements for personal or 25property losses; student financial assistance paid directly to 26the student or to an educational institution; foster child   SB1911 Engrossed- 18 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1care payments; receipts from government-funded training 2programs; assistance from the Supplemental Nutrition 3Assistance Program (SNAP). 4    "Low affordability community" means (1) a municipality or 5jurisdiction with less than 1,000,000 inhabitants in which 40% 6or less of its total year-round housing units are affordable, 7as determined by the Illinois Housing Development Authority 8during the exemption determination process under the 9Affordable Housing Planning and Appeal Act; (2) "D" zoning 10districts as now or hereafter designated in the Chicago Zoning 11Ordinance; or (3) a jurisdiction located in a municipality 12with 1,000,000 or more inhabitants that has been designated as 13a low affordability community by passage of a local ordinance 14by that municipality, specifying the census tract or property 15by permanent index number or numbers. 16    "Maximum income limits" means the maximum regular income 17limits for 60% of area median income for the geographic area in 18which the multifamily building is located for multifamily 19programs as determined by the United States Department of 20Housing and Urban Development and published annually by the 21Illinois Housing Development Authority. A property may be 22deemed to have satisfied the maximum income limits with a 23weighted average if municipal, state, or federal laws, 24ordinances, rules, or regulations requires the use of a 25weighted average of no more than 60% of area median income for 26that property.   SB1911 Engrossed- 19 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1    "Maximum rent" means the maximum regular rent for 60% of 2the area median income for the geographic area in which the 3multifamily building is located for multifamily programs as 4determined by the United States Department of Housing and 5Urban Development and published annually by the Illinois 6Housing Development Authority. To be eligible for the reduced 7valuation defined in this Section, maximum rents are to be 8consistent with the Illinois Housing Development Authority's 9rules; or if the owner is leasing an affordable unit to a 10household with an income at or below the maximum income limit 11who is participating in qualifying income-based rental subsidy 12program, "maximum rent" means the maximum rents allowable 13under the guidelines of the qualifying income-based rental 14subsidy program. A property may be deemed to have satisfied 15the maximum rent with a weighted average if municipal, state, 16or federal laws, ordinances, rules, or regulations requires 17the use of a weighted average of no more than 60% of area 18median income for that property. 19    "Qualifying development" means: 20        (1) property containing a newly constructed 21    multifamily building containing 7 or more rental dwelling 22    units; or 23        (2) property containing an existing multifamily 24    building that has undergone qualifying rehabilitation 25    resulting in 7 or more rental dwelling units; or 26        (3) in counties with a population of 3,000,000 or more   SB1911 Engrossed- 20 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1    inhabitants, property in a portfolio of properties 2    consisting of 7 or more total rental dwelling units across 3    2 or more multifamily rental buildings that are each newly 4    constructed or have undergone qualifying rehabilitation if 5    the portfolio meets all the following additional 6    requirements: 7            (A) all of the properties in the portfolio must be 8        under common ownership and must be part of a single 9        financial entity or treated as a single entity for the 10        purposes of financing, regulatory agreements, or 11        participation in a qualifying income-based subsidy 12        program; 13            (B) the portfolio, as a whole, must participate in 14        a qualifying income-based subsidy program; and 15            (C) if the portfolio includes units supported by 16        tenant-based rental assistance, including, but not 17        limited to, the Housing Choice Voucher program, the 18        portfolio must also: 19                (i) operate under a regulatory agreement with 20            a federal, State, or local housing agency that 21            imposes affordability restrictions; or 22                (ii) participate in an additional qualifying 23            income-based subsidy program beyond tenant-based 24            assistance. 25    "Qualifying income-based rental subsidy program" means a 26Housing Choice Voucher issued by a housing authority under   SB1911 Engrossed- 21 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, a tenant 2voucher converted to a project-based voucher by a housing 3authority or any other program administered or funded by a 4housing authority, the Illinois Housing Development Authority, 5another State agency, a federal agency, or a unit of local 6government where participation is limited to households with 7incomes at or below the maximum income limits as defined in 8this Section and the tenants' portion of the rent payment is 9based on a percentage of their income or a flat amount that 10does not exceed the maximum rent as defined in this Section.11    "Qualifying rehabilitation" means, at a minimum, 12compliance with local building codes and the replacement or 13renovation of at least 2 primary building systems to be 14approved for the reduced valuation under paragraph (1) of 15subsection (d) of this Section and at least 5 primary building 16systems to be approved for the reduced valuation under 17subsection (e) of this Section. Although the cost of each 18primary building system may vary, to be approved for the 19reduced valuation under paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of 20this Section, for work completed between January 1, 2021 and 21December 31, 2021, the combined expenditure for making the 22building compliant with local codes and replacing primary 23building systems must be at least $8 per square foot for work 24completed between January 1 of the year in which this 25amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly takes effect and 26December 31 of the year in which this amendatory Act of the   SB1911 Engrossed- 22 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1102nd General Assembly takes effect and, in subsequent years, 2$8 adjusted by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 3Consumers, as published annually by the U.S. Department of 4Labor. For work completed in calendar years beginning on or 5after January 1, 2022, that combined expenditure amount shall 6be the combined expenditure amount necessary to be approved 7for the reduced valuation under paragraph (1) of subsection 8(d) of this Section in the immediately preceding calendar 9year, multiplied by one plus the percentage increase, if any, 10in the Consumer Price Index-u during the immediately preceding 11calendar year and rounded to the nearest penny. To be approved 12for the reduced valuation under paragraph (2) of subsection 13(d) of this Section, for work completed between January 1, 142021 and December 31, 2021, the combined expenditure for 15making the building compliant with local codes and replacing 16primary building systems must be at least $12.50 per square 17foot for work completed between January 1 of the year in which 18this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly takes effect 19and December 31 of the year in which this amendatory Act of the 20102nd General Assembly takes effect, and in subsequent years, 21$12.50 adjusted by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 22Consumers, as published annually by the U.S. Department of 23Labor. For work completed in calendar years beginning on or 24after January 1, 2022, that combined expenditure amount shall 25be the combined expenditure amount necessary to be approved 26for the reduced valuation under paragraph (2) of subsection   SB1911 Engrossed- 23 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1(d) of this Section in the immediately preceding calendar 2year, multiplied by one plus the percentage increase, if any, 3in the Consumer Price Index-u during the immediately preceding 4calendar year and rounded to the nearest penny. To be approved 5for the reduced valuation under subsection (e) of this 6Section, for work completed between January 1, 2021 and 7December 31, 2021, the combined expenditure for making the 8building compliant with local codes and replacing primary 9building systems must be at least $60 per square foot for work 10completed between January 1 of the year that this amendatory 11Act of the 102nd General Assembly becomes effective and 12December 31 of the year that this amendatory Act of the 102nd 13General Assembly becomes effective and, in subsequent years, 14$60 adjusted by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban 15Consumers, as published annually by the U.S. Department of 16Labor. For work completed in calendar years beginning on or 17after January 1, 2022, that combined expenditure amount shall 18be the combined expenditure amount necessary to be approved 19for the reduced valuation under subsection (e) of this Section 20in the immediately preceding calendar year, multiplied by one 21plus the percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price 22Index-u during the immediately preceding calendar year and 23rounded to the nearest penny. This amendatory Act of the 104th 24General Assembly is not intended to change the combined 25expenditure amounts determined before the effective date of 26this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly for any work   SB1911 Engrossed- 24 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1completed before January 1, 2026 and shall not be used as the 2basis for any appeal filed with the chief county assessment 3officer, the board of review, the Property Tax Appeal Board, 4or the circuit court with respect to the scope or meaning of 5the exemption under this Section for a tax year prior to tax 6year 2026. 7    For the purposes of administering this Section, by 8February 15, 2026, and by February 15 of each year thereafter, 9the Department of Revenue shall publish on its website the 10percentage increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index-u for 11the immediately preceding calendar year, including historical 12annual increases in the Consumer Price Index-u going back to 13calendar year 2022. In counties with a population of 3,000,000 14or more, by March 15, 2026, and by March 15 of each year 15thereafter, the county assessor shall, using the data 16available on the Department of Revenue's website, calculate 17and make available on its website the combined expenditure 18amounts used in the definition of "qualified rehabilitation" 19for the applicable taxable year.20     "Primary building systems", together with their related 21rehabilitations, specifically approved for this program are: 22        (1) Electrical. All electrical work must comply with 23    applicable codes; it may consist of a combination of any 24    of the following alternatives: 25            (A) installing individual equipment and appliance 26        branch circuits as required by code (the minimum being   SB1911 Engrossed- 25 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1        a kitchen appliance branch circuit); 2            (B) installing a new emergency service, including 3        emergency lighting with all associated conduits and 4        wiring; 5            (C) rewiring all existing feeder conduits ("home 6        runs") from the main switchgear to apartment area 7        distribution panels;8            (D) installing new in-wall conduits for 9        receptacles, switches, appliances, equipment, and 10        fixtures; 11            (E) replacing power wiring for receptacles, 12        switches, appliances, equipment, and fixtures; 13            (F) installing new light fixtures throughout the 14        building including closets and central areas; 15            (G) replacing, adding, or doing work as necessary 16        to bring all receptacles, switches, and other 17        electrical devices into code compliance; 18            (H) installing a new main service, including 19        conduit, cables into the building, and main disconnect 20        switch; and 21            (I) installing new distribution panels, including 22        all panel wiring, terminals, circuit breakers, and all 23        other panel devices. 24        (2) Heating. All heating work must comply with 25    applicable codes; it may consist of a combination of any 26    of the following alternatives:   SB1911 Engrossed- 26 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1            (A) installing a new system to replace one of the 2        following heat distribution systems: 3                (i) piping and heat radiating units, including 4            new main line venting and radiator venting; or 5                (ii) duct work, diffusers, and cold air 6            returns; or 7                (iii) any other type of existing heat 8            distribution and radiation/diffusion components; 9            or 10            (B) installing a new system to replace one of the 11        following heat generating units: 12                (i) hot water/steam boiler; 13                (ii) gas furnace; or 14                (iii) any other type of existing heat 15            generating unit. 16        (3) Plumbing. All plumbing work must comply with 17    applicable codes. Replace all or a part of the in-wall 18    supply and waste plumbing; however, main supply risers, 19    waste stacks and vents, and code-conforming waste lines 20    need not be replaced. 21        (4) Roofing. All roofing work must comply with 22    applicable codes; it may consist of either of the 23    following alternatives, separately or in combination: 24            (A) replacing all rotted roof decks and 25        insulation; or 26            (B) replacing or repairing leaking roof membranes   SB1911 Engrossed- 27 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1        (10% is the suggested minimum replacement of 2        membrane); restoration of the entire roof is an 3        acceptable substitute for membrane replacement. 4        (5) Exterior doors and windows. Replace the exterior 5    doors and windows. Renovation of ornate entry doors is an 6    acceptable substitute for replacement. 7        (6) Floors, walls, and ceilings. Finishes must be 8    replaced or covered over with new material. Acceptable 9    replacement or covering materials are as follows: 10            (A) floors must have new carpeting, vinyl tile, 11        ceramic, refurbished wood finish, or a similar 12        substitute; 13            (B) walls must have new drywall, including joint 14        taping and painting; or 15            (C) new ceilings must be either drywall, suspended 16        type, or a similar material. 17        (7) Exterior walls. 18            (A) replace loose or crumbling mortar and masonry 19        with new material; 20            (B) replace or paint wall siding and trim as 21        needed; 22            (C) bring porches and balconies to a sound 23        condition; or 24            (D) any combination of (A), (B), and (C). 25        (8) Elevators. Where applicable, at least 4 of the 26    following 7 alternatives must be accomplished:   SB1911 Engrossed- 28 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1            (A) replace or rebuild the machine room controls 2        and refurbish the elevator machine (or equivalent 3        mechanisms in the case of hydraulic elevators); 4            (B) replace hoistway electro-mechanical items 5        including: ropes, switches, limits, buffers, levelers, 6        and deflector sheaves (or equivalent mechanisms in the 7        case of hydraulic elevators); 8            (C) replace hoistway wiring; 9            (D) replace door operators and linkage; 10            (E) replace door panels at each opening; 11            (F) replace hall stations, car stations, and 12        signal fixtures; or 13            (G) rebuild the car shell and refinish the 14        interior. 15        (9) Health and safety. 16            (A) Install or replace fire suppression systems; 17            (B) install or replace security systems; or 18            (C) environmental remediation of lead-based paint, 19        asbestos, leaking underground storage tanks, or radon. 20        (10) Energy conservation improvements undertaken to 21    limit the amount of solar energy absorbed by a building's 22    roof or to reduce energy use for the property, including, 23    but not limited to, any of the following activities: 24            (A) installing or replacing reflective roof 25        coatings (flat roofs); 26            (B) installing or replacing R-49 roof insulation;   SB1911 Engrossed- 29 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1            (C) installing or replacing R-19 perimeter wall 2        insulation; 3            (D) installing or replacing insulated entry doors; 4            (E) installing or replacing Low E, insulated 5        windows; 6            (F) installing or replacing WaterSense labeled 7        plumbing fixtures; 8            (G) installing or replacing 90% or better sealed 9        combustion heating systems; 10            (H) installing Energy Star hot water heaters; 11            (I) installing or replacing mechanical ventilation 12        to exterior for kitchens and baths; 13            (J) installing or replacing Energy Star 14        appliances; 15            (K) installing or replacing Energy Star certified 16        lighting in common areas; or 17            (L) installing or replacing grading and 18        landscaping to promote on-site water retention if the 19        retained water is used to replace water that is 20        provided from a municipal source. 21        (11) Accessibility improvements. All accessibility 22    improvements must comply with applicable codes. An owner 23    may make accessibility improvements to residential real 24    property to increase access for people with disabilities. 25    As used in this paragraph (11), "disability" has the 26    meaning given to that term in the Illinois Human Rights   SB1911 Engrossed- 30 -LRB104 09605 HLH 19670 b1    Act. As used in this paragraph (11), "accessibility 2    improvements" means a home modification listed under the 3    Home Services Program administered by the Department of 4    Human Services (Part 686 of Title 89 of the Illinois 5    Administrative Code) including, but not limited to: 6    installation of ramps, grab bars, or wheelchair lifts; 7    widening doorways or hallways; re-configuring rooms and 8    closets; and any other changes to enhance the independence 9    of people with disabilities. 10        (12) Any applicant who has purchased the property in 11    an arm's length transaction not more than 90 days before 12    applying for this reduced valuation may use the cost of 13    rehabilitation or repairs required by documented code 14    violations, up to a maximum of $2 per square foot, to meet 15    the qualifying rehabilitation requirements. 16(Source: P.A. 102-175, eff. 7-29-21; 102-893, eff. 5-20-22.)